Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2746
Action; time limitations.

An action under the County Court Expedited Civil Actions Act should ordinarily be submitted to the jury or the court within two business days from the commencement of trial. Unless the court allows additional time for good cause shown, each side shall be allowed no more than six hours to complete jury selection, opening statements, presentation of evidence, examination and cross-examination of witnesses, and closing arguments. Time spent on objections, bench conferences, and challenges for cause to a juror are not included in the time limit.

Laws 2020, LB912, § 6.